src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-unimorphstuff_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    allatīv+N+Sg+Nom: allatīv
    allatīv+N+Sg+Gen: allatīv
    allatīv+N+Sg+Dat: allatīvõn
    allatīv+N+Sg+Par: allatīvõ
    allatīv+N+Sg+Ins: allatīvõks
    allatīv+N+Sg+Ill: allatīvõ
    allatīv+N+Sg+Ine: allatīvs
    allatīv+N+Sg+Ela: allatīvst
    allatīv+N+Pl+Nom: allatīvõd
    allatīv+N+Pl+Gen: allatīvõd
    allatīv+N+Pl+Dat: allatīvõdõn
    allatīv+N+Pl+Par: allatīvidi
    allatīv+N+Pl+Ins: allatīvõdõks
    allatīv+N+Pl+Ill: allatīviž
    allatīv+N+Pl+Ine: allatīvis
    allatīv+N+Pl+Ela: allatīvist
    alli+N+Sg+Nom: aʼlli
    alli+N+Sg+Gen: alīz
    alli+N+Sg+Dat: alīzõn
    alli+N+Sg+Par: alīzt
    alli+N+Sg+Ins: alīzõks
    alli+N+Sg+Ill: alīzõ
    alli+N+Sg+Ine: alīzõs
    alli+N+Sg+Ela: alīzõst
    alli+N+Pl+Nom: aʼllizt
    alli+N+Pl+Gen: aʼllizt
    alli+N+Pl+Dat: aʼlliztõn
    alli+N+Pl+Par: alīži
    alli+N+Pl+Ins: aʼlliztõks
    alli+N+Pl+Ill: alīžiz
    alli+N+Pl+Ine: alīžis
    alli+N+Pl+Ela: alīžist
    alli+N+Sg+Nom: aʼlli
    alli+N+Sg+Gen: alīz
    alli+N+Sg+Dat: alīzõn
    alli+N+Sg+Par: alīzt
    alli+N+Sg+Ins: alīzõks
    alli+N+Sg+Ill: alīzõ
    alli+N+Sg+Ine: alīzõs
    alli+N+Sg+Ela: alīzõst
    alli+N+Pl+Nom: aʼllizt
    alli+N+Pl+Gen: aʼllizt
    alli+N+Pl+Dat: aʼlliztõn
    alli+N+Pl+Par: alīži
    alli+N+Pl+Ins: aʼlliztõks
    alli+N+Pl+Ill: alīžiz
    alli+N+Pl+Ine: alīžis
    alli+N+Pl+Ela: alīžist
    allikiv+N+Sg+Nom: aʼllikiʼv
    allikiv+N+Sg+Gen: aʼllikiʼv
    allikiv+N+Sg+Dat: aʼllikiʼvvõn
    allikiv+N+Sg+Par: aʼllikiʼvvõ
    allikiv+N+Sg+Ins: aʼllikiʼvkõks
    allikiv+N+Sg+Ill: aʼllikiʼvvõ
    allikiv+N+Sg+Ine: aʼllikiʼvsõ
    allikiv+N+Sg+Ela: aʼllikiʼvstõ
    allikiv+N+Pl+Nom: aʼllikiʼvīd
    allikiv+N+Pl+Gen: aʼllikiʼvīd
    allikiv+N+Pl+Dat: aʼllikiʼvīdõn
    allikiv+N+Pl+Par: aʼllikiʼvīdi
    allikiv+N+Pl+Ins: aʼllikiʼvīdõks
    allikiv+N+Pl+Ill: aʼllikiʼvīž
    allikiv+N+Pl+Ine: aʼllikiʼvīs
    allikiv+N+Pl+Ela: aʼllikiʼvīst
    allikuoț+N+Sg+Nom: aʼllikuoț
    allikuoț+N+Sg+Gen: aʼllikuoț
    allikuoț+N+Sg+Dat: aʼllikuoțțõn
    allikuoț+N+Sg+Par: aʼllikuoțțõ
    allikuoț+N+Sg+Ins: aʼllikuoțțõks
    allikuoț+N+Sg+Ill: aʼllikuoțțõ
    allikuoț+N+Sg+Ine: aʼllikuoțšõ
    allikuoț+N+Sg+Ela: aʼllikuoțštõ
    allikuoț+N+Pl+Nom: aʼllikuoțīd
    allikuoț+N+Pl+Gen: aʼllikuoțīd
    allikuoț+N+Pl+Dat: aʼllikuoțīdõn
    allikuoț+N+Pl+Par: aʼllikuoțīdi
    allikuoț+N+Pl+Ins: aʼllikuoțīdõks
    allikuoț+N+Pl+Ill: aʼllikuoțīž
    allikuoț+N+Pl+Ine: aʼllikuoțīs
    allikuoț+N+Pl+Ela: aʼllikuoțīst
    allimi+N+Sg+Nom: aʼllimi
    allimi+N+Sg+Gen: aʼllimiz
    allimi+N+Sg+Dat: aʼllimizõn
    allimi+N+Sg+Par: aʼllimizt
    allimi+N+Sg+Ins: aʼllimizõks
    allimi+N+Sg+Ill: aʼllimizõ
    allimi+N+Sg+Ine: aʼllimizõs
    allimi+N+Sg+Ela: aʼllimizõst
    allimi+N+Pl+Nom: aʼllimizt
    allimi+N+Pl+Gen: aʼllimizt
    allimi+N+Pl+Dat: aʼllimiztõn
    allimi+N+Pl+Par: aʼllimiži
    allimi+N+Pl+Ins: aʼllimiztõks
    allimi+N+Pl+Ill: aʼllimižiz
    allimi+N+Pl+Ine: aʼllimižis
    allimi+N+Pl+Ela: aʼllimižist
    allipaḑā+N+Sg+Nom: aʼllipaḑā
    allipaḑā+N+Sg+Gen: aʼllipaḑā
    allipaḑā+N+Sg+Dat: aʼllipaḑān
    allipaḑā+N+Sg+Par: aʼllipaʼḑḑõ
    allipaḑā+N+Sg+Ins: aʼllipaḑāks
    allipaḑā+N+Sg+Ill: aʼllipaʼḑḑõ
    allipaḑā+N+Sg+Ine: aʼllipaḑās
    allipaḑā+N+Sg+Ela: aʼllipaḑāst
    allipaḑā+N+Pl+Nom: aʼllipaḑād
    allipaḑā+N+Pl+Gen: aʼllipaḑād
    allipaḑā+N+Pl+Dat: aʼllipaḑādõn
    allipaḑā+N+Pl+Par: aʼllipaḑīdi
    allipaḑā+N+Pl+Ins: aʼllipaḑādõks
    allipaḑā+N+Pl+Ill: aʼllipaḑīž
    allipaḑā+N+Pl+Ine: aʼllipaḑīs
    allipaḑā+N+Pl+Ela: aʼllipaḑīst
    alliserk+N+Sg+Nom: aʼlliserk
    alliserk+N+Sg+Gen: aʼlliserk
    alliserk+N+Sg+Dat: aʼlliserkõn
    alliserk+N+Sg+Par: aʼlliserkõ
    alliserk+N+Sg+Ins: aʼlliserkõks
    alliserk+N+Sg+Ill: aʼlliserkõ
    alliserk+N+Sg+Ine: aʼlliserksõ
    alliserk+N+Sg+Ela: aʼlliserkstõ
    alliserk+N+Pl+Nom: aʼllisērkõd
    alliserk+N+Pl+Gen: aʼllisērkõd
    alliserk+N+Pl+Dat: aʼllisērkõdõn
    alliserk+N+Pl+Par: aʼllisērkidi
    alliserk+N+Pl+Ins: aʼllisērkõdõks
    alliserk+N+Pl+Ill: aʼllisērkiž
    alliserk+N+Pl+Ine: aʼllisērkis
    alliserk+N+Pl+Ela: aʼllisērkist
    alliskūol+N+Sg+Nom: aʼlliskūol
    alliskūol+N+Sg+Gen: aʼlliskūol
    alliskūol+N+Sg+Dat: aʼlliskūolõn
    alliskūol+N+Sg+Par: aʼlliskūolõ
    alliskūol+N+Sg+Ins: aʼlliskūolõks
    alliskūol+N+Sg+Ill: aʼlliskūolõ
    alliskūol+N+Sg+Ine: aʼlliskūolsõ
    alliskūol+N+Sg+Ela: [aʼlliskūolstõ, aʼlliskūolst]
    alliskūol+N+Pl+Nom: aʼlliskūolõd
    alliskūol+N+Pl+Gen: aʼlliskūolõd
    alliskūol+N+Pl+Dat: aʼlliskūolõdõn
    alliskūol+N+Pl+Par: aʼlliskūolidi
    alliskūol+N+Pl+Ins: aʼlliskūolõdõks
    alliskūol+N+Pl+Ill: aʼlliskūoliž
    alliskūol+N+Pl+Ine: aʼlliskūolis
    alliskūol+N+Pl+Ela: aʼlliskūolist
    allitas+N+Sg+Nom: aʼllitas
    allitas+N+Sg+Gen: aʼllitas
    allitas+N+Sg+Dat: aʼllitassõn
    allitas+N+Sg+Par: aʼllitassõ
    allitas+N+Sg+Ins: aʼllitassõks
    allitas+N+Sg+Ill: aʼllitassõ
    allitas+N+Sg+Ine: aʼllitassõs
    allitas+N+Sg+Ela: aʼllitassõst
    allitas+N+Pl+Nom: aʼllitassõd
    allitas+N+Pl+Gen: aʼllitassõd
    allitas+N+Pl+Dat: aʼllitassõdõn
    allitas+N+Pl+Par: aʼllitassidi
    allitas+N+Pl+Ins: aʼllitassõdõks
    allitas+N+Pl+Ill: aʼllitassiž
    allitas+N+Pl+Ine: aʼllitassis
    allitas+N+Pl+Ela: aʼllitassist
    allitutkām+N+Sg+Nom: aʼllitutkām
    allitutkām+N+Sg+Gen: aʼllitutkām
    allitutkām+N+Sg+Dat: aʼllitutkāmõn
    allitutkām+N+Sg+Par: aʼllitutkāmt
    allitutkām+N+Sg+Ins: aʼllitutkāmõks
    allitutkām+N+Sg+Ill: aʼllitutkāmõ
    allitutkām+N+Sg+Ine: aʼllitutkāmõs
    allitutkām+N+Sg+Ela: aʼllitutkāmõst
    allitutkām+N+Pl+Nom: aʼllitutkāmõd
    allitutkām+N+Pl+Gen: aʼllitutkāmõd
    allitutkām+N+Pl+Dat: aʼllitutkāmõdõn
    allitutkām+N+Pl+Par: aʼllitutkāmidi
    allitutkām+N+Pl+Ins: aʼllitutkāmõdõks
    allitutkām+N+Pl+Ill: aʼllitutkāmiž
    allitutkām+N+Pl+Ine: aʼllitutkāmis
    allitutkām+N+Pl+Ela: aʼllitutkāmist
    almi+N+Sg+Nom: aʼlmi
    almi+N+Sg+Gen: aʼlmiz
    almi+N+Sg+Dat: aʼlmizõn
    almi+N+Sg+Par: aʼlmizt
    almi+N+Sg+Ins: aʼlmizõks
    almi+N+Sg+Ill: aʼlmizõ
    almi+N+Sg+Ine: aʼlmizõs
    almi+N+Sg+Ela: aʼlmizõst
    almi+N+Pl+Nom: aʼlmizt
    almi+N+Pl+Gen: aʼlmizt
    almi+N+Pl+Dat: aʼlmiztõn
    almi+N+Pl+Par: aʼlmiži
    almi+N+Pl+Ins: aʼlmiztõks
    almi+N+Pl+Ill: aʼlmižiz
    almi+N+Pl+Ine: aʼlmižis
    almi+N+Pl+Ela: aʼlmižist
    almit+N+Sg+Nom: aʼlmit
    almit+N+Sg+Gen: aʼlmit
    almit+N+Sg+Dat: aʼlmitõn
    almit+N+Sg+Par: aʼlmitõ
    almit+N+Sg+Ins: aʼlmitõks
    almit+N+Sg+Ill: aʼlmitõ
    almit+N+Sg+Ine: aʼlmitõs
    almit+N+Sg+Ela: aʼlmitõst
    almit+N+Pl+Nom: aʼlmitõd
    almit+N+Pl+Gen: aʼlmitõd
    almit+N+Pl+Dat: aʼlmitõdõn
    almit+N+Pl+Par: aʼlmitidi
    almit+N+Pl+Ins: aʼlmitõdõks
    almit+N+Pl+Ill: aʼlmitiž
    almit+N+Pl+Ine: aʼlmitis
    almit+N+Pl+Ela: aʼlmitist
    āltar+N+Sg+Nom: āltar
    āltar+N+Sg+Gen: āltar
    āltar+N+Sg+Dat: āltarõn
    āltar+N+Sg+Par: āltart
    āltar+N+Sg+Ins: āltarõks
    āltar+N+Sg+Ill: āltarõ
    āltar+N+Sg+Ine: āltarõs
    āltar+N+Sg+Ela: āltarõst
    āltar+N+Pl+Nom: āltard
    āltar+N+Pl+Gen: āltard
    āltar+N+Pl+Dat: āltardõn
    āltar+N+Pl+Par: āltaŗi
    āltar+N+Pl+Ins: āltardõks
    āltar+N+Pl+Ill: āltaŗiž
    āltar+N+Pl+Ine: āltaŗis
    āltar+N+Pl+Ela: āltaŗist
    altimi+N+Sg+Nom: aʼltimi
    altimi+N+Sg+Gen: aʼltimiz
    altimi+N+Sg+Dat: aʼltimizõn
    altimi+N+Sg+Par: aʼltimizt
    altimi+N+Sg+Ins: aʼltimizõks
    altimi+N+Sg+Ill: aʼltimizõ
    altimi+N+Sg+Ine: aʼltimizõs
    altimi+N+Sg+Ela: aʼltimizõst
    altimi+N+Pl+Nom: aʼltimizt
    altimi+N+Pl+Gen: aʼltimizt
    altimi+N+Pl+Dat: aʼltimiztõn
    altimi+N+Pl+Par: aʼltimiži
    altimi+N+Pl+Ins: aʼltimiztõks
    altimi+N+Pl+Ill: aʼltimižiz
    altimi+N+Pl+Ine: aʼltimižis
    altimi+N+Pl+Ela: aʼltimižist
    alumīnij+N+Sg+Nom: alumīnij
    alumīnij+N+Sg+Gen: alumīnij
    alumīnij+N+Sg+Dat: alumīnijõn
    alumīnij+N+Sg+Par: alumīnijõ
    alumīnij+N+Sg+Ins: alumīnijõks
    alumīnij+N+Sg+Ill: alumīnijõ
    alumīnij+N+Sg+Ine: alumīnijsõ
    alumīnij+N+Sg+Ela: alumīnijstõ
    alumīnij+N+Pl+Nom: alumīnijd
    alumīnij+N+Pl+Gen: alumīnijd
    alumīnij+N+Pl+Dat: alumīnijdõn
    alumīnij+N+Pl+Par: alumīnijḑi
    alumīnij+N+Pl+Ins: alumīnijdkõks
    alumīnij+N+Pl+Ill: alumīnijži
    alumīnij+N+Pl+Ine: alumīnijši
    alumīnij+N+Pl+Ela: alumīnijšti
    alumīnijpadā+N+Sg+Nom: alumīnijpadā
    alumīnijpadā+N+Sg+Gen: alumīnijpadā
    alumīnijpadā+N+Sg+Dat: alumīnijpadān
    alumīnijpadā+N+Sg+Par: alumīnijpaʼddõ
    alumīnijpadā+N+Sg+Ins: alumīnijpadāks
    alumīnijpadā+N+Sg+Ill: alumīnijpaʼddõ
    alumīnijpadā+N+Sg+Ine: alumīnijpadās
    alumīnijpadā+N+Sg+Ela: alumīnijpadāst
    alumīnijpadā+N+Pl+Nom: alumīnijpadād
    alumīnijpadā+N+Pl+Gen: alumīnijpadād
    alumīnijpadā+N+Pl+Dat: alumīnijpadādõn
    alumīnijpadā+N+Pl+Par: alumīnijpadīdi
    alumīnijpadā+N+Pl+Ins: alumīnijpadādõks
    alumīnijpadā+N+Pl+Ill: alumīnijpadīž
    alumīnijpadā+N+Pl+Ine: alumīnijpadīs
    alumīnijpadā+N+Pl+Ela: alumīnijpadīst
    alūmnikā+N+Sg+Nom: alūmnikā
    alūmnikā+N+Sg+Gen: alūmnikā
    alūmnikā+N+Sg+Dat: alūmnikān
    alūmnikā+N+Sg+Par: alūmnikkõ
    alūmnikā+N+Sg+Ins: alūmnikāks
    alūmnikā+N+Sg+Ill: alūmnikkõ
    alūmnikā+N+Sg+Ine: alūmnikās
    alūmnikā+N+Sg+Ela: alūmnikāst
    alūmnikā+N+Pl+Nom: alūmnikād
    alūmnikā+N+Pl+Gen: alūmnikād
    alūmnikā+N+Pl+Dat: alūmnikādõn
    alūmnikā+N+Pl+Par: alūmnikīdi
    alūmnikā+N+Pl+Ins: alūmnikādõks
    alūmnikā+N+Pl+Ill: alūmnikīž
    alūmnikā+N+Pl+Ine: alūmnikīs
    alūmnikā+N+Pl+Ela: alūmnikīst
    alve+N+Sg+Nom: alve
    alve+N+Sg+Gen: alve
    alve+N+Sg+Dat: alven
    alve+N+Sg+Par: alve
    alve+N+Sg+Ins: alveks
    alve+N+Sg+Ill: alvez
    alve+N+Sg+Ine: alves
    alve+N+Sg+Ela: alvest
    alve+N+Pl+Nom: alved
    alve+N+Pl+Gen: alved
    alve+N+Pl+Dat: alvedõn
    alve+N+Pl+Par: alvidi
    alve+N+Pl+Ins: alvedõks
    alve+N+Pl+Ill: alviž
    alve+N+Pl+Ine: alvis
    alve+N+Pl+Ela: alvist
    aļ+N+Sg+Nom: aļ
    aļ+N+Sg+Gen: aļ
    aļ+N+Sg+Dat: aļļõn
    aļ+N+Sg+Par: aļļõ
    aļ+N+Sg+Ins: aļļõks
    aļ+N+Sg+Ill: aļļõ
    aļ+N+Sg+Ine: aļšõ
    aļ+N+Sg+Ela: aļštõ
    aļ+N+Pl+Nom: ǭļõd
    aļ+N+Pl+Gen: ǭļõd
    aļ+N+Pl+Dat: ǭļõdõn
    aļ+N+Pl+Par: ǭļidi
    aļ+N+Pl+Ins: ǭļõdõks
    aļ+N+Pl+Ill: ǭļiž
    aļ+N+Pl+Ine: ǭļis
    aļ+N+Pl+Ela: ǭļist
    āļdža+N+Sg+Nom: āļdža
    āļdža+N+Sg+Gen: āļdža
    āļdža+N+Sg+Dat: āļdžan
    āļdža+N+Sg+Par: aļdžõ
    āļdža+N+Sg+Ins: āļdžaks
    āļdža+N+Sg+Ill: aļdžõ
    āļdža+N+Sg+Ine: āļdžas
    āļdža+N+Sg+Ela: āļdžast
    āļdža+N+Pl+Nom: āļdžad
    āļdža+N+Pl+Gen: āļdžad
    āļdža+N+Pl+Dat: āļdžadõn
    āļdža+N+Pl+Par: aļdžḑi
    āļdža+N+Pl+Ins: āļdžadõks
    āļdža+N+Pl+Ill: āļdžiz
    āļdža+N+Pl+Ine: āļdžis
    āļdža+N+Pl+Ela: āļdžist
    aļļõm+N+Sg+Nom: aļļõm
    aļļõm+N+Sg+Gen: aļļõm
    aļļõm+N+Sg+Dat: aļļõmõn
    aļļõm+N+Sg+Par: aļļõmt
    aļļõm+N+Sg+Ins: aļļõmõks
    aļļõm+N+Sg+Ill: aļļõmõ
    aļļõm+N+Sg+Ine: aļļõms
    aļļõm+N+Sg+Ela: aļļõmst
    aļļõm+N+Pl+Nom: aļļõmõd
    aļļõm+N+Pl+Gen: aļļõmõd
    aļļõm+N+Pl+Dat: aļļõmõdõn
    aļļõm+N+Pl+Par: aļļõmidi
    aļļõm+N+Pl+Ins: aļļõmõdõks
    aļļõm+N+Pl+Ill: aļļõmiž
    aļļõm+N+Pl+Ine: aļļõmis
    aļļõm+N+Pl+Ela: aļļõmist
    aļtimi+N+Sg+Nom: aļtimi
    aļtimi+N+Sg+Gen: aļtimiz
    aļtimi+N+Sg+Dat: aļtimizõn
    aļtimi+N+Sg+Par: aļtimizt
    aļtimi+N+Sg+Ins: aļtimizõks
    aļtimi+N+Sg+Ill: aļtimizõ
    aļtimi+N+Sg+Ine: aļtimizõs
    aļtimi+N+Sg+Ela: aļtimizõst
    aļtimi+N+Pl+Nom: aļtimizt
    aļtimi+N+Pl+Gen: aļtimizt
    aļtimi+N+Pl+Dat: aļtimiztõn
    aļtimi+N+Pl+Par: aļtimiži
    aļtimi+N+Pl+Ins: aļtimiztõks
    aļtimi+N+Pl+Ill: aļtimižiz
    aļtimi+N+Pl+Ine: aļtimižis
    aļtimi+N+Pl+Ela: aļtimižist
    aļtõm+N+Sg+Nom: aļtõm
    aļtõm+N+Sg+Gen: aļtõm
    aļtõm+N+Sg+Dat: aļtõmõn
    aļtõm+N+Sg+Par: aļtõmt
    aļtõm+N+Sg+Ins: aļtõmõks
    aļtõm+N+Sg+Ill: aļtõmõ
    aļtõm+N+Sg+Ine: aļtõms
    aļtõm+N+Sg+Ela: aļtõmst
    aļtõm+N+Pl+Nom: aļtõmõd
    aļtõm+N+Pl+Gen: aļtõmõd
    aļtõm+N+Pl+Dat: aļtõmõdõn
    aļtõm+N+Pl+Par: aļtõmidi
    aļtõm+N+Pl+Ins: aļtõmõdõks
